Alaska, session 34, SJR13.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. Article IV, sec. 5, Constitution of the State of Alaska, is amended to read: 05 Section 5. [NOMINATION AND] Appointment. The governor shall fill any 06 vacancy in an office of supreme court justice or superior court judge by appointing 07 one of the [TWO OR MORE] persons determined [NOMINATED] by the judicial 08 council to meet all the qualifications for appointment under Section 4 of this 09 article. 10 * Sec. 2. The amendments proposed by this resolution shall be placed before the voters of 11 the state at the next general election in conformity with art. XIII, sec. 1, Constitution of the 12 State of Alaska, and the election laws of the state. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.